District of Columbia statutes.
2-359.10

Employees subject to employee conduct standards of Merit Personnel Act.

(a)

Except for those District government employees employed by agencies not subject to Chapter 6 of Title 1 [§ 1-601.01 et seq.], District government employees who participate in the procurement process shall be subject to the provisions of subchapter XVIII of Chapter 6 of Title 1 [§ 1-618.01 et seq.].

(b)

Participation in the procurement process shall include involvement, either directly or indirectly, in:

(1)

The decision, approval, disapproval, recommendation, or preparation of any part of a purchase request;

(2)

Influencing the content of any specification or purchase standard;

(3)

Rendering of advice;

(4)

An investigation or audit; or

(5)

Any other advisory capacity pertaining to any contract, subcontract, solicitation, or proposal.

Apr. 8, 2011, D.C. Law 18-371, § 910, 58 DCR 1185